Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-201.03
Office services; authorized; powers.

The Department of Agriculture may provide (1) data and word processing services, (2) accounting and auditing services, (3) personnel services, (4) records management services, (5) printing, sorting, and mailing services, (6) statistical services, (7) such services necessary to carry out any duties or responsibilities placed upon the department by the Legislature, and (8) other related services in cooperation with, on behalf of, or for any board, commission, or political subdivision of the state or any other agency of the state or federal government.

Laws 1983, LB 579, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 6.